California, session 20252026, AB29.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14105.198 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14105.198. (a) The department shall, as part of its requirements under subdivision (d) of Section 14105.197, include the following enrolled Medi-Cal providers as providers qualified to provide, and eligible to receive payments for, Adverse Childhood Experiences (ACEs) trauma screenings pursuant to Section 14105.197:(1) Community-based organizations and local health jurisdictions that provide health services through community health workers.(2) Doulas.(b) The department shall require the providers listed in subdivision (a) to make clinical or other appropriate referrals based on the results of the screenings as a condition of payment for conducting ACEs trauma screenings.(b)(c) The department shall file a state plan amendment and seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.(c)(d) The department shall update its internet website and the ACEs Aware website to reflect the addition of the Medi-Cal providers described in subdivision (a) as qualified to provide ACEs trauma screenings.(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of a provider manual, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.